North Carolina, session 2025, SB984.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 50-13.4(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Remedies for enforcement of support of minor children shall be available as follows:
…
(9) An order for the periodic payments of child support or a child support
judgment that provides for periodic payments is enforceable by proceedings
for civil contempt, and disobedience may be punished by proceedings for
criminal contempt, as provided in Chapter 5A of the General Statutes.
Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 1-294, an order for the payment of
child support which has been appealed to the appellate division is enforceable
in the trial court by proceedings for civil contempt during the pendency of the
appeal. Upon motion of an aggrieved party, the court of the appellate division
in which the appeal is pending may stay any order for civil contempt entered
for child support until the appeal is decided, if justice requires.
As a special condition of a contempt order, the court may direct the person
into job search or dually specific education training. If the court selects this
option, the court shall review the person's progress in 30-day intervals, at a
minimum, unless the person is enrolled and actively participating in
work-specific training. The person's enrollment in work-specific training shall
not exceed six months and the person shall satisfy all of the following
requirements:
a. Pay a minimum of fifty dollars ($50.00) monthly child support.
b. Notify the court upon completion from work-specific training.
c. Notify the court within 14 days of failing to satisfy the attendance
requirements of work-specific training.
…."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be distributed to applicable community colleges for the purpose of
defraying the costs of work‑specific training for participants in this program.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S984-v-1*